Utah statutes.
76-10-2702.   Penalty for littering on a park, recreation area, waterway, or other public or private land.

(1)  A person who violates any of the provisions of Section 76-10-2701 is guilty of a class C misdemeanor and shall be fined not less than $100 for each violation.

(2)  The sentencing judge may require that the offender devote at least four hours in cleaning up:

(a)  litter caused by the offender; and

(b)  existing litter from a safe area designated by the sentencing judge.

